Missouri, session 2026, HB1843.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 43.506, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 43.506, to read as follows:
43.506. 1. Those offenses considered reportable for the purposes of sections 43.500
to 43.651 include all felonies; class A misdemeanors; all violations for driving under the
influence of drugs or alcohol; any offense that can be enhanced to a class A misdemeanor or
higher for subsequent violations, except for the offense of littering under section 577.070;
and comparable ordinance violations consistent with the reporting standards established by
the National Crime Information Center, Federal Bureau of Investigation, for the Federal
Interstate Identification Index System; and all cases arising under chapter 566. The following
types of offenses shall not be considered reportable for the purposes of sections 57.403,
43.500 to 43.651, and 595.200 to 595.218: nonspecific charges of suspicion or investigation,
general traffic violations and all misdemeanor violations of the state wildlife code. All
offenses considered reportable shall be reviewed annually and noted in the Missouri charge
code manual established in section 43.512. All information collected pursuant to sections
43.500 to 43.651 shall be available only as set forth in section 610.120.
2. Law enforcement agencies, court clerks, prosecutors and custody agencies may
report required information by electronic medium either directly to the central repository or
indirectly to the central repository via other criminal justice agency computer systems in the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1843 2
state with the approval of the highway patrol, based upon standards established by the
advisory committee.
3. In addition to the repository of fingerprint records for individual offenders and
applicants, the central repository of criminal history and identification records for the state
shall maintain a repository of latent prints, palm prints and other unique biometric
identification submitted to the repository.
✔